Mississippi, session 2026, SB2731.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 43-27-201, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 43-27-201.  (1)  The purpose of this section is to outline and structure a long-range proposal in addition to certain immediate objectives for improvements in the juvenile facilities of the Division of Youth Services of the Mississippi Department of Human Services in order to provide modern and efficient rehabilitation facilities for juvenile offenders in Mississippi, who are committing an increasing percentage of serious and violent crimes. (2)  The Division of Youth Services shall establish, maintain and operate * * * an Adolescent Opportunity Program (AOP) a Juvenile Justice Diversion Program (JJDP) throughout the state, which may include non-Medicaid assistance eligible juveniles.  Beginning July 1, 2016, subject to availability of funds appropriated therefor by the Legislature, * * * AOP JJDP professional services, salaries, facility offices, meeting rooms and related supplies and equipment may be provided through contract with local mental health centers or other nonprofit community organizations.  Each * * * AOP JJDP participating organizations must incorporate evidence-based practices and positive behavioral intervention that includes two (2) or more of the following elements:  academic * * *, tutoring * * *, and literacy, mentoring, vocational training, substance abuse treatment and education, individual counseling, family counseling and social adaptability skills training to include, but not limited to, conflict resolution and anger management.  Programs may include, but shall not be limited to, after school and weekend programs, job readiness programs, home detention programs, community service conflict resolution programs, restitution and community service. (3)  The JJDP shall offer alternatives to detention during after school and weekend hours to include, but not limited to, job-readiness skills training, curfew and house arrest monitoring, community service work hours, and restitution and restorative justice practices. (4)  Subject to availability of funds appropriated therefor by the Legislature, the JJDP may operate as pre-petition diversion and as a post-adjudication diversion for the purpose of diverting juveniles from detention.  The Division of Youth Services shall be responsible for programmatic oversight, including placement and services provided to juveniles diverted from the Youth Courts in the pre-petition setting.  The Youth Courts, in consultation with the Division of Youth Services, shall be responsible for overseeing placement and services to be provided to juveniles in the post-adjudication setting. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.